South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4692.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Resource Independence and Resilience Act." SECTION 2.  Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: CHAPTER 35 State Resource Commission Section 1-35-10. It is the policy of the State of South Carolina to: (1) achieve and maintain a minimum percentage in the in-state production of the following categories of essential resources: (a) agricultural products and food necessary for the nutrition and sustenance of South Carolina residents; (b) electricity, natural gas, renewable energy, and fuel sources used in residential, commercial, industrial, and public infrastructure; and (c) water infrastructure and critical materials as designated and updated periodically by the South Carolina Department of Commerce, in consultation with the South Carolina Department of Agriculture and other relevant agencies; (2) set the minimum percentage set forth in item (1) to fifteen percent by 2031, and twenty-five percent by 2036; and (3) establish intermediate benchmarks and strategies to guide implementation, measure performance, and ensure continuous progress toward the twenty-five percent target. Section 1-35-20. (A) There is established the "State Resource Commission" (SRC) within the Office of the Governor. (B) The commission shall: (1) coordinate statewide resource independence initiatives in collaboration with relevant state agencies; (2) develop and oversee a comprehensive implementation plan to meet the benchmarks set forth in this chapter; (3) maintain a public dashboard tracking progress, performance data, and updates to the state's critical resources list; and (4) facilitate interagency cooperation and stakeholder engagement. (C) The SRC shall consist of the following members, all appointed by the Governor: (1) one representative from the Department of Commerce; (2) one representative from the Department of Agriculture; (3) one representative from the State Energy Office; (4) one representative from the Department of Natural Resources; (5) one representative from Clemson University; and (6) two members from the private sector with relevant industry expertise. Section 1-35-30. (A) The SRC shall consult with the Department of Commerce, the Department of Revenue, and other relevant agencies to develop and recommend a package of incentives to promote in-state production of essential resources, including: (1) tax credits for businesses and individuals engaged in local food or energy production; (2) grants or low-interest loans for infrastructure, equipment, and capacity building for small producers and manufacturers; and (3) specific incentive programs for farmers, solar and renewable energy developers, cooperatives, and small manufacturers contributing to the production benchmarks established by this chapter. (B) In developing the package required by subsection (A), the SRC shall prioritize the in-state production of essential resources in and for rural, underserved, and economically distressed communities. Section 1-35-40. (A) The SRC shall submit an annual report to the General Assembly, beginning no later than December 31, 2027, and each year thereafter, detailing: (1) progress toward the benchmarks established in this chapter; (2) challenges or barriers to implementation; (3) recommendations for policy modifications, funding needs, or legislative changes; and (4) a summary of public and private sector contributions. (B) All reports shall be made available to the public through a dedicated website managed by the SRC. Section 1-35-50. (A) The SRC is authorized to facilitate public-private partnerships with: (1) research universities, community colleges, and technical schools to develop workforce training programs and resource-related technology; (2) electric cooperatives, agricultural cooperatives, and industry associations to scale up local production; and (3) nonprofit organizations and local governments to support regional resilience and capacity building. (B) Additionally, the provisions of this chapter may be funded by: (1) appropriations from the General Assembly; (2) federal infrastructure, agricultural, or energy grants, as available; and (3) private-sector partnerships and contributions as set forth in subsection (A), including cost-sharing agreements. (C) The SRC is authorized to apply for and manage any grants or appropriations necessary to fulfill its duties under this chapter. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect July 1, 2026. ----XX----